New York, session 2025-2026, S6232.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2504-c to read as follows: 3 § 2504-c. Prenatal and postpartum informational mobile application. 1. 4 The department shall create and operate a New York-tailored, member- 5 ship-based mobile application for prenatal, pregnant and postpartum 6 individuals who are eligible for Medicaid. 7 2. (a) The commissioner is authorized to contract with a mobile devel- 8 oper to create and operate such application on a statewide basis follow- 9 ing a competitive bidding process as set forth in the state finance law. 10 (b) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of mental 11 health, shall include the following application platform deliverables in 12 the request for proposals: 13 (i) The platform shall have the capability to deliver education, 14 resources and support to prenatal, pregnant and postpartum individuals 15 and their families, including New York-specific information such as 16 links to department and other state agency programs and resources avail- 17 able to prenatal, pregnant and postpartum individuals; 18 (ii) The platform shall demonstrate a consistent workflow to increase 19 awareness of state agency programs and resources available to users of 20 the mobile application; 21 (iii) The platform shall allow the department and other state agencies 22 to directly interface with users of the mobile application; 23 (iv) The platform shall have the capability to allow the department to 24 share specific content and resources with users of the mobile applica- 25 tion; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03921-01-5 S. 6232 2 1 (v) The platform shall include information and resources in the mobile 2 application that meet the standards set forth in subdivision one of 3 section three hundred sixty-five-k of the social services law; and 4 (vi) The platform shall be available in multiple languages in accord- 5 ance with section two hundred two-a of the executive law. 6 3. The selected mobile developer shall regularly provide the depart- 7 ment, the temporary president of the senate, the minority leader of the 8 senate, the speaker of the assembly, and the minority leader of the 9 assembly with aggregate, deidentified data concerning the following: 10 (a) the number of users of the mobile application that are eligible 11 for Medicaid; 12 (b) the number of users of the mobile application that are engaging 13 with New York-specific content; 14 (c) the number of users of the mobile application seeking additional 15 information about enrollment in the Medicaid program or other available 16 resources; 17 (d) the number of monthly users of the mobile application; 18 (e) the number of daily users of the mobile application; 19 (f) the average length of time a user uses the mobile application; and 20 (g) any other information requested by the department or other state 21 agencies. 22 4. The mobile application shall be available on multiple mobile plat- 23 forms. 24 5. The selected mobile developer shall not share, sell, or otherwise 25 process users' personal information except as strictly necessary for the 26 operation of the mobile application and shall not provide personally 27 identifiable information about any user to the department, the office of 28 children and family services, or any other governmental entity. 29 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 30 the date on which it shall have become a law; provided, however, that 31 the department of health shall issue a request for proposals no later 32 than one hundred eighty days after this act shall have become a law.